Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,262
Regulatory authority; sections; how construed.

Except as specifically provided in sections 25-21,254 to 25-21,261, such sections do not affect the regulatory authority that any department or agency has to require any action associated with the information disclosed.

Laws 1998, LB 395, § 9.